District of Columbia statutes.
2-1606

Annual report and audit.

(a)

The Board of Trustees of the Service shall submit a fiscal year report of the Service’s operations to the Congress of the United States, to the chief judges of the federal courts in the District of Columbia and of the District of Columbia courts, and to the Office of Management and Budget. The report shall include a statement of the financial condition of the Service and a summary of services performed during the year.

(b)

The Board of Trustees shall annually arrange for an independent audit to be prepared by a certified public accountant or by a designee of the Office of Management and Budget.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 657, Pub. L. 91-358, title III, § 306
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 762, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11272(c)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2428, Pub. L. 105-274, § 7(d), (e)(2)(A)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2706.
1973 Ed., § 2-2226.

Editor's Notes

Section 11272 of Pub. L. 105-33: Section 7(d) of Pub. L. 105-274 provided that § 11272 of Pub. L. 105-33, which had amended this section, is repealed, effective October 21, 1998. This section is set out above as it would have appeared absent the enactment of § 11272.